lexc/verb/enhuigeik.lexc
LEXICON Imperoeuetor
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrepoeuetor;
                      Nrepoeuetor2;

LEXICON Imper1oeuetor
+Imper:^+cImp^§AA§t  Nrepoeuetor;
                      Nrep1oeuetor;

LEXICON Nrepoeuetor
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Potoeuetor;
                     Potoeuetor2;
LEXICON Nrepoeuetor2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Potoeuetor;
                     Potoeuetor2;

LEXICON Nrep1oeuetor
+Rep:^+cNrep^ög§AA§t  Potoeuetor;
                     Pot1oeuetor;

LEXICON Potoeuetor
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeuetor;
                     Caseoeue;
LEXICON Potoeuetor2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeuetor;
                     Caseoeue;

LEXICON Pot1oeuetor
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeuetor;
                     Case1oeue;
LEXICON AddInfoeuetor
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
                Caseoeue;
! torik uses case of oeue

LEXICON AddVerboeuedz
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repoeuedz;

LEXICON Repoeuedz
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^g§AA§t  Imperoeuedz;
                    Imper1oeuedz;

LEXICON Imperoeuedz
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrepoeuedz;
                      Nrepoeuedz2;

LEXICON Imper1oeuedz
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Nrepoeuedz;
                      Nrep1oeuedz;

LEXICON Nrepoeuedz
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Potoeuedz;
                     Potoeuedz2;
LEXICON Nrepoeuedz2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Potoeuedz;
                     Potoeuedz2;

LEXICON Nrep1oeuedz
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Potoeuedz;
                     Pot1oeuedz;

LEXICON Potoeuedz
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeuedz;
                     Caseoeue;
LEXICON Potoeuedz2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeuedz;
                     Caseoeue;

LEXICON Pot1oeuedz
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeuedz;
                     Case1oeue;
LEXICON AddInfoeuedz
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
                Caseoeue;
! oeuedz uses cases of oeue

LEXICON AddVerboeue
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repoeue;

LEXICON Repoeue
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^g§AA§t  Imperoeue;
                    Imper1oeue;

LEXICON Imperoeue
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrepoeue;
                      Nrepoeue2;

LEXICON Imper1oeue
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Nrepoeue;
                      Nrep1oeue;

LEXICON Nrepoeue
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Potoeue;
                     Potoeue2;
LEXICON Nrepoeue2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Potoeue;
                     Potoeue2;

LEXICON Nrep1oeue
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Potoeue;
                     Pot1oeue;

LEXICON Potoeue
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeue;
                     Caseoeue;
LEXICON Potoeue2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeue;
                     Caseoeue;

LEXICON Pot1oeue
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeue;
                     Case1oeue;
LEXICON AddInfoeue
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
             Caseoeue;

LEXICON Verb
bőgőzik:bőgőz AddVerboeue;
bőrödzik:bőrödz AddVerboeuedz;
bűnözik:bűnöz AddVerboeue;
csőrözik:csőröz AddVerboeue;
dörgölődzik:dörgölődz AddVerboeuedz;
dörgölőzik:dörgölőz AddVerboeue;
ejtőzik:ejtőz AddVerboeue;
esküdözik:esküdöz AddVerboeue;
esőzik:esőz AddVerboeue;
felhőzik:felhőz AddVerboeue;
fenyegetődzik:fenyegetődz AddVerboeue;
fenyegetőzik:fenyegetőz AddVerboeue;
fröccsözik:fröccsöz AddVerboeue;
férkőzik:férkőz AddVerboeue;
fürdőzik:fürdőz AddVerboeue;
fűlik:fűl AddVerboeue;
fűtőzik:fűtőz AddVerboeue;
gyöngyözik:gyöngyöz AddVerboeue;
gyümölcsözik:gyümölcsöz AddVerboeue;
gyürkőzik:gyürkőz AddVerboeue;
gyűrűdzik:gyűrűdz AddVerboeuedz;
gyűrűzik:gyűrűz AddVerboeue;
hempergődzik:hempergődz AddVerboeuedz;
hempergőzik:hempergőz AddVerboeue;
hengergőzik:hengergőz AddVerboeue;
hentergőzik:hentergőz AddVerboeue;
hűtőzik:hűtőz AddVerboeue;
időzik:időz AddVerboeue;
járőrözik:járőröz AddVerboeue;
kergetődzik:kergetődz AddVerboeuedz;
kergetőzik:kergetőz AddVerboeue;
keringőzik:keringőz AddVerboeue;
kettőzik:kettőz AddVerboeue;
kisbőgőzik:kisbőgőz AddVerboeue;
képesítőzik:képesítőz AddVerboeue;
kérődzik:kérődz AddVerboeuedz;
költözik:költöz AddVerboeue;
követelődzik:követelődz AddVerboeuedz;
követelőzik:követelőz AddVerboeue;
különbözik:különböz AddVerboeue;
levegőzik:levegőz AddVerboeue;
likőrözik:likőröz AddVerboeue;
légfürdőzik:légfürdőz AddVerboeue;
mentegetődzik:mentegetődz AddVerboeuedz;
mentegetőzik:mentegetőz AddVerboeue;
mérkőzik:mérkőz AddVerboeue;
napfürdőzik:napfürdőz AddVerboeue;
nőszik:nősz AddVerboeue;
nőzik:nőz AddVerboeue;
pezsgőzik:pezsgőz AddVerboeue;
rejtőzik:rejtőz AddVerboeue;
rémüldözik:rémüldöz AddVerboeue;
szellőzik:szellőz AddVerboeue;
szörfözik:szörföz AddVerboeue;
sörözik:söröz AddVerboeue;
tekergődzik:tekergődz AddVerboeue;
tekergőzik:tekergőz AddVerboeue;
tekerődzik:tekerődz AddVerboeuedz;
tekerőzik:tekerőz AddVerboeue;
tetőzik:tetőz AddVerboeue;
törölközik:törölköz AddVerboeue;
törülközik:törülköz AddVerboeue;
vetkőzik:vetkőz AddVerboeue;
ö-zik:ö-z AddVerboeue;
öklelődzik:öklelődz AddVerboeue;
öklelőzik:öklelőz AddVerboeue;
öltözik:öltöz AddVerboeue;
ütközik:ütköz AddVerboeue;
üvöltözik:üvöltöz AddVerboeue;
